Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-106.02
Board of Regents; works of art; duties.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, in consultation with the Nebraska Arts Council, shall determine the amount of money to be made available for the purchases of art for each project under its supervision. The selection of, commissioning of artists for, reviewing of design, execution and placement of, and the acceptance of works of art for each project shall be the responsibility of the Board of Regents in consultation with the Nebraska Arts Council.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 11.